The leader of Aarhus is Jacob Bundsgaard.
The runway length at Aarhus Airport is 2702.0.
Adirondack Regional Airport is 507 metres above sea level.
Adirondack Regional Airport is located in Harrietstown, New York.
Adolfo Suarez Madrid-Barajas Airport is located in San Sebastian de los Rey
The runway name of Adolfo Suarez Madrid-Barajas Airport is 14L/32
The runway name of Adolfo Suarez Madrid-Barajas Airport is 14R/32
Afonso Pena International Airport is operated by Infraero.
Agra Airport is located in Agra.
Al Taqaddum Air Base is 84 metres above sea level.
Alderney Airport serves Alderney.
The runway name of Allama Iqbal International Airport is 18R/36L.
Alpena County Regional Airport has a runway length of 1533.0.
The runway name of Alpena County Regional Airport is 1/19.
Amsterdam Airport Schiphol serves the city of Amsterdam.
Andrews County is the county seat of Andrews County, Texas.
Andrews County Airport serves Andrews, Texas.
The runway name of Andrews County Airport is 11/29.
The runway name of Andrews County Airport is Helipad.
Angola International Airport serves the city of Luanda.
Ardmore Airport is located in Auckland, New Zealand.
Giorgos Kaminis is the mayor of Athens.
Athens International Airport is located in Spata.
German is spoken in Belgium.
Philippe of Belgium is the leader of Belgium.
The capital of Denmark is Copenhagen.
Lars Lokke Rasmussen is the leader of Denmark.
The leader of the Flemish Region is the Flemish Government.
Greek is spoken in Greece.
Nikos Voutsis is the leader of Greece.
Harrietstown, New York is part of the United States.
Anwar Zaheer Jamali is the leader of Pakistan.
Paracuellos de Jarama is part of the Community of Madrid.
The Port Authority of New York and New Jersey is headquartered at the Four World Trade
San Sebastian de los Reyes is located in Spain.
Saranac Lake, New York is part of the United States.
Stephen Dilts is the Chief of South Jersey Transportation Authority.
Aaron Bertram began his career in 1998.
Aaron Deer is associated with The Horns of Happiness.
Aaron Turner plays avant-garde metal.
Aaron Turner plays black metal music.
Aaron Turner is from Boston.
Abradab is associated with the musical artist Magik.
The solo singer Abradab is a solo singer.
Ace Wilder was born on 23rd July 1982.
Ace Wilder's record label is EMI Records.
Agustin Barboza is signed to Philips Records.
Alan Frew is associated with Glass Tiger.
Albennie Jones was born in Errata, Mississippi.
Aleksandra Kovac is associated with Kornelije Kovac.
Aleksandra Kovac is a solo singer.
Aleksandra Kovac performs soul music.
Alfred Garth Jones died in London.
Alfredo Zitarrosa is associated with Hilario Perez.
Alfredo Zitarrosa plays Milonga music.
Alfredo Zitarrosa's record label is Movieplay.
Alison O'Donnell started his career in 1963.
Allen Forrest plays pop music.
Anders Osborne's record label is Alligator Records.
Anders Osborne's record label is Shanachie Records.
Andrew Rayel is associated with Jwaydan Moyine.
Andrew Rayel was born in Chisinau, Moldova.
Andrew White plays alternative rock music.
Asuncion is part of Gran Asunción.
Deram Records is located in London.
Afrobeat is a fusion genre of Funk.
The sub genre of hip hop music is Gangsta rap.
Jazz has its stylistic origins in blues.
RCA Records is distributed by Legacy Recordings.
Black metal is a musical genre of Twilight.
The British people live in the United Kingdom.
Alan Shepard was awarded the Distinguished Service Medal by the United States Navy.
Alan Shepard died in California.
The Apollo 11 backup pilot was William Anders.
Apollo 14 is operated by NASA.
Apollo 8 is operated by NASA.
Buzz Aldrin is a US national.
Elliot See was a test pilot.
The University of Texas at Austin is affiliated with the University of Texas system.
The mascot of the University of Texas at Austin is Hook 'em.
Silvio Berlusconi is the chairman of A.C. Milan.
Aaron Boogaard was born in Canada.
Abel Hernández plays for Uruguay Olympic football team.
Abel Hernández plays for the Uruguay national football team.
Abner plays for C.D. FAS.
Adam Maher was born in Ait Ikwa, Qatar.
Adam Maher was born in Diemen.
Adam McQuaid was born in Charlottetown.
Ahmad Kadhim Assad was born in Iraq.
Ahmad Kadhim Assad plays for PAS Tehran F.C.
Akeem Ayers is a Linebacker.
Akeem Priestley plays for FK Mughan.
Akeem Priestley plays for the Jacksonville Dolphins.
Al-Khor Sports Club play in the Qatar Stars League.
Alaa Abdul Zahra was born in Bakdad.
Alan Martin plays for Accrington Stanley F.C.
Alan Martin plays for Crewe Alexandra F.C.
Aleksander Barkov Jr. was born in Finland.
Aleksander Barkov Jr. plays for the Florida Panthers.
Aleksander Barkov Jr. plays in the National Hockey League.
Aleksandre Guruli plays for FC Samtredia.
Alex Plante was born in Manitoba.
Alex Plante has a height of 1.9304.
Drew Caldwell is the leader of Brandon, Manitoba.
The city of Budapest is located in Hungary.
Inuktitut is the language spoken in Canada.
The Columbus Blue Jackets are located in Columbus, Ohio.
FC Terek Grozny's ground is in Grozny.
FC Tom Tomsk play in the Russian Football National League.
Valery Petrakov is the manager of FC Torpedo Moscow.
The general manager of Florida Panthers is Dale Tallon.
The coach of Maccabi Tel Aviv B.C. is Zan Tabak.
Olympique Lyonnais's ground is Parc Olympique Lyonnais.
Jorge Orosmán da Silva is the manager of Penarol.
Point Fortin is located in Trinidad.
103 Colmore Row was designed by John Madin.
103 Colmore Row is located at Colmore Row.
11 Diagonal Street was completed in 1983.
200 Public Square was completed in 1985.
20 Fenchurch Street was started in January 2009.
20 Fenchurch Street is located in the United Kingdom.
300 North LaSalle has 60 floors.
The architect of 3Arena is HOK SVE.
3Arena is located at East Link Bridge.
Adare Manor was started in 1700.
Adare Manor is located in the Republic of Ireland.
The Akita Museum of Art was inaugurated on the 28th of September 2013.
The current tenants of Alan B Miller Hall are the Mason School of Business.
The architect of Amdavad ni Gufa is B V Doshi.
Ampara Hospital is located in Sri Lanka.
Asher and Mary Isabelle Richardson House was added to the National Register of Historic
Asser Levy Public Baths was constructed in 1904.
The postal code of Birmingham is B.
Chicago is part of DuPage County, Illinois.
Dublin is located in the Republic of Ireland.
Dublin is part of Leinster.
Sumitra Mahajan is the leader of India.
The Brazilians are an ethnic group in Japan.
Tarō Aso is the leader of Japan.
Bill Marriott is a key person at Marriott International.
English is spoken in the Republic of Ireland.
The capital of South Africa is Cape Town.
London is the capital of the United Kingdom.
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States where one of the 
Paul Ryan is the leader of the United States.
The discoverer of (29075) 1950 DA was Carl A Wirtanen.
(410777) 2009 FD has an apoapsis of 259776702.47055 kilometres.
(66063) 1998 RO1 has an epoch date of 2004-11-04.
(66391) 1999 KW4 has a periapsis of 29919600000.0.
101 Helena has a mass of 3.0 kilograms.
101 Helena has an orbital period of 1516.6700000000003 days.
1036 Ganymed has an average speed of 16.88 kilometres per second.
1036 Ganymed has a temperature of 160.0 kelvins.
107 Camilla was discovered by F Vilas.
N.R. Pogson discovered 107 Camilla.
1089 Tama has an escape velocity of 0.0068 kilometres per second.
The rotation period of 1097 Vicia is 95040.0.
1099 Figneria has an escape velocity of 0.0155 kilometres per second.
1099 Figneria has a mass of 2.7 kg.
109 Felicitas has a periapsis of 283326000000.0.
109 Felicitas has a temperature of 170.0 kelvins.
10 Hygiea has an orbital period of 5.57 days.
1101 Clematis has a periapsis of 445895000000.0.
110 Lydia has an epoch date of December 31st 2006.
110 Lydia has a periapsis of 377016000000.0.
N.R. Pogson is a national of England.
Abilene, Texas has the area code of 325.
Abilene is part of Texas.
The leader of Albany, Georgia is the Mayor.
Albany, Oregon has a total area of 45.97 square kilometres.
Albany, Oregon is located in the United States.
The state Senate leads Albuquerque, New Mexico.
Albuquerque City Council is the leader of Albuquerque, New Mexico.
Amarillo, Texas is located in the United States.
Amarillo is part of Potter County, Texas.
Amarillo, Texas is part of the United States.
The area code of Anaheim, California is 657.
Anderson, Indiana is part of Adams Fall Creek, Lafayette, Richland, Union.
Angola is part of Pleasant Township, Steuben County, Indiana.
The city Administrator is the leader of Ann Arbor, Michigan.
The leader of Ann Arbor, Michigan is the Mayor.
Ann Arbor, Michigan has a population density of 1580.7 inhabitants per square
The elevation of Antioch, California is 13 metres above sea level.
The Californias 11th State Assembly District is the leader of Antioch, California.
Arlington, Texas is 184.0 above sea level.
Atlantic County, New Jersey is located in the United States.
Attica is part of Fountain County, Indiana.
Auburn is part of Alabama.
California is located in the United States.
Atlanta is the largest city in Fulton County, Georgia.
Georgia is located in the United States.
The capital of Indiana is Indianapolis.
Lee County is in Alabama.
The capital of New Jersey is Trenton.
Potter County is in Texas.
Tarrant County, Texas is located in the United States.
Ann Arbor is the largest city in Washtenaw County, Michigan.
The comic character Asterix was created by René Goscinny.
The comic character Auron was created by Marv Wolfman.
The comic character Balder was created by Jack Kirby.
Bananaman was broadcast by STV.
Bananaman first aired on 3 October 1983.
Bill Oddie stars in Bananaman.
Baymax is a character in Big Hero 6.
Bill Everett won the Eisner Award.
Bill Oddie's wife is Kate Hardie.
The comic character Bolt was created by Dan Mishkin.
Bozo the Iron Man's full name is Hugh Hazzard.
John Buscema won the Eagle Award.
Marv Wolfman won the Eagle Award.
Ajoblanco (also known as Ajo blanco) is also known as Ajo blanco.
The main ingredients of Ajoblanco are bread, almonds, garlic, water and
Arem arem is a food found nationwide in Indonesia but more specific to Java.
Arem arem is a food found in Indonesia.
The main ingredients of Arrabbiata sauce are Tomatoes, red chili, gar
Cuttlefish is an ingredient in Arròs negre.
Squid is an ingredient in Arròs negre.
Asam pedas comes from Malaysia.
Avocado is a genus of Persea.
Ayam penyet is served hot.
Baked Alaska is a dessert.
Frangipane is an ingredient of Bakewell tart.
Noodles are an ingredient in Bakso.
Vermicelli is an ingredient in Bakso.
Chorizo is an ingredient in Bandeja paisa.
Barny cakes was created by Mondelez International.
Barny cakes can be varied by choc.
Barny cakes contain 1.8g of protein.
Batchoy comes from the Philippines.
Chicken is an ingredient in Batchoy.
Batchoy contains vegetables.
Binignit is from the Visayas region.
Patrick McLoughlin is the leader of Derbyshire Dales.
Dessert is a variation of cake.
Ice cream is a dessert.
Jusuf Kalla is the leader of Indonesia.
The people of Italy live in Italy.
Baduy is an ethnic group in Java.
Lemon is a member of the Rosids order.
Mexicans live in Mexico.
Spanish is spoken in Mexico.
Arabic is spoken in the Philippines.
Shumai is a variation of Siomay.
The 1955 Dodge has the alternative name of Dodge Coronet.
The 1955 Dodge has a 230 cubic inches engine.
AIDA Cruises is located in Rostock.
The AIDAluna began his career on March 22, 2009.
The AIDAluna is a Sphinx class cruise ship.
The AIDAstella was built by Meyer Werft.
The christening date of AIDAstella is March 16th 2013.
The AIDAstella was in service on March 17th 2013.
The ALCO RS-3 has a four-stroke engine.
The ALV X-1 was manufactured by Alliant Techsystems.
The AMC Matador and the AMC Ambassador are similar means of transport.
The Abarth 1000 GT Coupé started out in 1958.
The Acura TLX has a 3.5 litre engine.
The Acura TLX has a Honda K engine.
The Acura TLX has a 9 speed ZF 9HP automatic (V6) transmission
The Alfa Romeo 164 is a executive car.
The Alfa Romeo 164 is related to the Fiat Croma.
The Alhambra had its maiden voyage on July 7th 1855.
The Alhambra has a ship beam of 8.3m.
The Alhambra has a top speed of 18.52.
The Antares rocket had its final flight on the 28th of October 2014.
The Ariane 5 had its maiden flight on August 11th 2005.
The Ariane 5 was manufactured by Airbus Defence and Space.
Atlas II originated from the United States.
The Atlas II's final flight was on March 16th 1998.
The Audi e-tron is a division of Audi.
The Audi A1 is assembled at Audi Brussels.
Caterpillar Inc. was founded in California.
Douglas R Oberhelman is a key person at Caterpillar Inc.
Caterpillar Inc. is located in Peoria, Illinois.
The Delta II was launched from Cape Canaveral Air Force Station.
The Sami languages are spoken in Finland.
Stanislaw Tillich is the leader of Germany.
The Guiana Space Centre is headquartered at Kourou, French Guiana.
The Honda division is Acura.
The Lancia Thema is related to the Alfa Romeo 164.
Meyer Werft is located in Germany.
Meyer Werft is located in Papenburg.
The Atatürk Monument (İzmir) was designed by Pietro Canonica.
The bronze Atatürk Monument (İzmir) is made of bronze.
Artur Rasizade is the leader of Azerbaijan.
Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is located in Azerbaijan.
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is made of red granite and white 
Aaron S. Daggett won the Purple Heart.
Aaron S Daggett fought in the Battle of Mine Run.
Abdul Rahman Ya'kub was in office while Tuanku Bujang Tuanku Othman
Abdul Taib Mahmud's alma mater is the University of Adelaide.
Abdul Taib Mahmud's region is Kota Samarahan.
Abdul Taib Mahmud was succeeded by Adenan Satem.
Abdul Taib Mahmud was succeeded by Sulaiman Abdul Rahman Taib.
Abdulsalami Abubakar was in the Nigerian Army.
Abel Caballero was in office while Juan Carlos I of Spain was Monarch.
Abner W. Sibal fought in World War II.
Abraham A Ribicoff was succeeded by Anthony J Celebrezze.
Adam Koc won the Cross of Valour (Poland).
Adam Koc died in New York City.
Adenan Satem attended the University of Adelaide.
Adonis Georgiadis worked as the Deputy Minister for Development, Competitiveness and
Agnes Kant worked at the House of Representatives in the Netherlands.
Agnes Kant lives in the Netherlands.
Airey Neave won the Territorial Decoration.
Airey Neave was born in Knightsbridge, London.
Airey Neave started out in 1935.
Alberto Teisaire is a national of Argentina.
Alfred Moore Scales fought in the Battle of Chancellorsville.
Alfred Moore Scales fought in the Underland Campaign.
Allan Shivers fought in World War II.
Allan Shivers served in the United States Army.
Alvah Sabin ended his career on March 3rd 1857.
Alvah Sabin was a member of the Whig Party in the United States.
Antonis Samaras was succeeded by Konstantinos Mitsotakis.
Gabriela Michetti is the leader of Argentina.
Austrian German is the language spoken in Austria.
The Battle of Fredericksburg was part of the American Civil War conflict.
Edmund J. Davis died in Austin, Texas.
Josef Klaus graduated from the University of Vienna.
Juan Peron is a member of the Labour Party in Argentina.
Mike Akhigbe's predecessor was Oladipo Diya.
The Nigerian Air Force commander is Sadique Abubakar.
The Romani people are an ethnic group in Poland.
The Kashubian language is spoken in Poland.
Peter Stöger is the manager of 1. FC Köln.
1 FC Magdeburg play in the 2014 season.
A.C. Lumezzane played in the Lega Pro season in 2014.
A.D. Isidro Metapán's full name is Asociacion Deportiva.
The full name of A.E Dimitra Efxeinoupolis is A.E Dimitra
A.E Dimitra Efxeinoupolis play in the 2014 season.
A.E Dimitra Efxeinoupolis play in the 2014-15 A EPSTH, 
A.F.C. Blackpool has 1500 members.
A.F.C. Fylde's ground is The Fylde.
A.S. Gubbio 1910's ground is in Italy.
A.S. Livorno Calcio has 19238 members.
A.S. Roma played in the Serie A in 2014-15.
Frank de Boer is the manager of AFC Ajax.
The nickname of AFC Ajax (amateurs) is "Joden , Den
AFC Ajax (amateurs) has 5000 members.
AZAL PFK is located in Shuvalan, Baku, Azerbaijan.
AZ Alkmaar has 17023 members.
Agremiação Sportiva Arapiraquense is managed by Vica.
Agremiação Sportiva Arapiraquense competed in the 2015 Campeonato Brasileiro
Akron Summit Assault's ground is St Vincent-St Mary High School.
Akron Summit Assault has 3000 members.
Amsterdam is part of Amsterdam-Centrum.
Nikos Voutsis is the leader of Greece.
Gus Poyet plays for AEK Athens FC.
Jens Härtel plays for SV Germania Schoneiche.
John van den Brom plays for AZ Alkmaar.
Jorge Humberto Rodríguez plays for A.D. Isidro Metapán.
Massimo Drago plays for Delfino Pescara 1936.
Massimo Drago plays for S.S. Chieti Calcio.
The Olympic Stadium (Athens) is located in Marousi.
K-W United FC are the champions of Premier Development League.
Stuart Parker (footballer) plays for Bury FC.
The Accademia di Architettura di Mendrisio has 100 academic staff.
In Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sarvapalli Radhakrishnan Road, Hess
Alba Iulia is located in Romania.
Alba Iulia is part of Alba County.
The patron saint of Romania is Andrew the Apostle.
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University has 737 academic staff.
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University is located in Denmark.
Eric Flint is the author of 1634: The Bavarian Crisis.
1634: The Bavarian Crisis was preceded by The Grantville Gazettes.
1634: The Ram Rebellion was followed by 1634: The Cantan Law.
AIP Advances has the EISSN number 2158.
A Fortress of Grey Ice is available in hardcover.
A Long Long Way has the ISBN number 0-670-03380-4.
A Loyal Character Dancer has the ISBN number 1-56947-301-3.
Madeleine Lendingle is the author of A Severed Wasp.
A Wizard of Mars is written in English.
Abhandlungen aus dem Mathematischen Seminar der Universität Hamburg has the LCCN number 32024459.
Above the Veil is available in hardcover.
The abbreviation of Acta Mathematica Hungarica is Acta Math. Hungar.
The Acta Mathematica Hungarica's academic discipline is Math.
The Acta Palaeontologica Polonica has the CODEN code APGPAC.
The Addiction journal has the OCLC number 27367194.
The Addiction journal is published by Wiley-Blackwell.
The LCCN number of Administrative Science Quarterly is 57059226.
Aenir has the OCLC number 45644811.
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians has the OCLC number 78771100.
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians was followed by Alcatraz Versus the Scri
The American Journal of Mathematics has an impact factor of 1.377.
The novel Castle was followed by Aenir.
Cornell University's nickname is Cornell Big Red.
HIV is part of the Lentivirus genus.
John Cowper Powys's notable work is Wolf Solent.
Elizabeth II is the leader of the United Kingdom.
Joe Biden is a leader in the United States.
Wolf Solent was written by John Cowper Powys.
Abilene Regional Airport serves the city of Abilene, Texas which is part
Adolfo Suárez Madrid-Barajas Airport is located in Alcobendas 
Adolfo Suarez Madrid-Barajas Airport is located in San Sebastian de los Rey
Agra Airport is located in India which is led by T S Thakur.
Al Asad Airbase is located in Al Anbar Province, Iraq and is 
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Adolfo Suárez Madrid–Barajas Airport is located in Alcobendas,
The 1st runway at Alderney Airport has a length of 877.0 and
Allama Iqbal International Airport is operated by the Pakistan Civil Aviation Authority which
Alpena County Regional Airport is located in Wilson Township, Alpena County, Michigan,
The Schiphol Group is the operating organisation for Amsterdam Airport Schiphol which is -3.
Andrews County Airport is 973 metres above sea level and has a 4th
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas where Austin is the capital.
Angola International Airport is 159 metres above sea level and serves the city of Lu
Angola International Airport is located in Ícolo e Bengo, Angola.
The Flemish department of Mobility and Public Works is the operating organisation for Antwerp International
Appleton International Airport serves Appleton, Wisconsin which is part of Grand Chute,
Ardmore Airport (New Zealand)'s 2nd runway surface type is Poaceae 
Ardmore Airport (New Zealand)'s 3rd runway surface type is Poaceae 
Ashgabat International Airport is located in Ashgabat and has a runway 
Athens International Airport serves the city of Athens which is located in Spata.
Athens International Airport serves the city of Athens which has a runway length of
Adolfo Suárez Madrid–Barajas Airport is located in San Sebastian de los
Aaron Bertram is associated with Kids Imagine Nation and Suburban Legends '
Aaron Bertram plays for the Suburban Legends which is a Ska music
Aaron Deer plays Psychedelia / TSP.
Aaron Turner is associated with the Lotus Eaters band and Isis.
Abradab was born in Katowice, Katowice, Poland.
Ace Wilder performs hip hop music which has its origins in Disco.
Al Anderson plays rock music which originated from country music.
Alan Frew plays rock music which originated from country music.
Albennie Jones plays jazz which originated from blues.
Albennie Jones performs rhythm and blues which originated from blues.
Aleksandra Kovac started performing in 1990 and performs soul music.
Alex Day plays Synthpop which originated from disco.
Alex Day plays Synthpop which originated from new wave music.
Alfredo Zitarrosa died in Montevideo which is led by Daniel Martinez.
Alfredo Zitarrosa is a solo singer who performs Zamba (art
Alison O'Donnell is associated with Plastik Mak < TSP and Head South By
Alison O'Donnell is a jazz musician who plays the autoharp
Allen Forrest plays pop music which is a solo singer.
The musician Andrew White plays alternative rock which is a fusion genre of Nu metal
Anders Osborne is associated with the musical artist Billy Iuso < TS and Theres
Anders Osborne's genre is rhythm and blues which is signed to Raba
Andra is a pop musician who began her career in 2000.
Andra is a solo singer who performs pop music which is a pop music
Andra is a singer of pop music which is a fusion genre of pop music
Andrew Rayel is associated with Mark Sixma and Jonathan Mendelsohn 's
Andrew Rayel is associated with Mark Sixma <TSP and Christian Burns.
Andrew White is a alternative rock musician who is associated with Marry Banilow 
Alfredo Zitarrosa was born in Uruguay, where Tabaré Vázquez is
Alan Shepard, who was a crew member of Apollo 14 crew, retired
Buzz Aldrin is a US national who was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey.
Buzz Aldrin, a fighter pilot, was retired.
Buzz Aldrin was a crew member of Apollo 11 which was operated by NASA
Buzz Aldrin was a fighter pilot and served as a crew member of
Aaron Hunt plays for SV Werder Bremen II and VfL Wolfsburg 
Abel Hernandez plays for U.S. Città di Palermo and Penarol.
Adam Maher plays for the Netherlands national under 17 football team and plays for PSV
Ahmad Kadhim Assad plays for Steel Azin FC and Al-Naft.
Akeem Adams plays for Ferencvarosi TC which is managed by Thomas Doll
Akeem Dent was born on 27th September 1987 and was born on 27th September
Akeem Dent was born in Atlanta, Georgia in 1987.
Akeem Dent made his debut for the Atlanta Falcons which are owned by
Akeem Priestley was born in Jamaica, where Patrick Allen is a
Alaa Abdul-Zahra plays for Al-Zawra'a SC and Al-
Alan Martin plays for Hamilton Academical FC and Barrow A.F.C.
Aleksandr Chumakov plays for FC Torpedo Moscow which is managed by Valer
Aleksandr Chumakov died in Russia which is led by Sergey Naryshkin.
Aleksandr Chumakov died in Russia which is led by Vladimir Putin.
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Tom Tomsk which play in the Russian Football National League
Aleksandre Guruli, who plays for FC Karpaty Lviv, played for AS
Aleksandre Guruli plays for FC Dinamo Batumi and FC Karpaty Lviv 
Alessio Romagnoli plays for A.C. Milan which is a Defender
Alessio Romagnoli plays for A.S. Roma which play in Serie A.
Alex Plante was born in Manitoba in 1989.
Alex Tyus was born on 8th January 1988 and plays for Pallacanestro Cant
Aaron Boogaard was born in Canada where English is spoken.
Adam McQuaid was born in Canada where English is spoken.
Abel Hernández plays for Hull City A.F.C. whose manager is
11 Diagonal Street is located in South Africa which has Coloured as an ethnic
200 Public Square, which has 45 floors, is located in Cleveland, 
20 Fenchurch Street is located in London which is led by the European Parliament.
250 Delaware Avenue is located in the United States where Barack Obama is the leader
300 North LaSalle is located in Illinois which has 60 floors.
HOK SVE was the architect of 3Arena, which is located at North Wall
Live Nation Entertainment is the owner of 3Arena which is located at East Link Bridge.
3Arena is owned by Live Nation Entertainment which is located at Beverly Hills
The AC Hotel Bella Sky Copenhagen has 23 floors and is tenanted by Marriott International
The current tenants of Addis Ababa City Hall are the Government of Addis A
Adisham Hall is located in Haputale, Sri Lanka and has architectural style
Adisham Hall is located in Sri Lanka where Tamil is spoken.
Alan B. Miller Hall, located at 101 Ukrop Way, began on 30 March
Alan B. Miller Hall is located in Williamsburg, Virginia and is owned by the
The Mason School of Business is the tenant of Alan B. Miller Hall which was
Ampara Hospital is located in the Ampara District of Sri Lanka which is located
Ampara Hospital is located in Sri Lanka which has Sri Jayawardenepura Kotte
Asher and Mary Isabelle Richardson House is located at U.S. Route 83
Asilomar Conference Grounds, located at Asilomar Blvd., Pacific Grove
Asilomar Conference Grounds, located in Pacific Grove, California, was added to
Asser Levy Public Baths, constructed in 1904, is located on 23rd
Anandiben Patel <T> Amdavad ni Gufa is located in Gujarat
(410777) 2009 FD has an apoapsis of 259776702.47055 kilometres and
The celestial body known as (410777) 2009 FD has a periapsis
(66063) 1998 RO1 has an escape velocity of 0.0999 kilometres per second
(66391) 1999 KW4 has an epoch date of 14th July 2004 and
101 Helena has an average speed of 18.44 kilometres per second and an apoap
The celestial body known as 1036 Ganymed has an average speed of 16.
103 Hera was discovered by James Craig Watson, a national of Canada.
103 Hera was discovered by James Craig Watson, who originated from Canada.
103 Hera has an epoch date of 27th August 2011 and a peria
N.R. Pogson discovered 107 Camilla which has an epoch
The celestial body known as 1097 Vicia has an orbital period of 13558900
1099 Figneria has an apoapsis of 605718000.0 kilometres and an
1099 Figneria has an epoch date of 31 December 2006 and a per
The former name of 10 Hygiea is "A900 GA" which has an
1101 Clematis has an epoch date of December 31st 2006 and a
110 Lydia has an epoch date of 31 December 2006 and a rotation period
11264 Claudiomaccone has an epoch date of 26 November 2005 and a
Albany, Georgia is part of the United States where African Americans are an ethnic
Albany is part of Oregon which is the largest city in Oregon.
Alexandria, Indiana has a population density of 755.3 inhabitants per square kilometr
Amarillo is part of Potter County, Texas, United States.
Anaheim, California has a total area of 131.6 square kilometres and is 48.0
Anderson is part of Anderson Township, Madison County, Indiana, United States.
Anderson is part of Fall Creek Township, Madison County, Indiana, United States.
Anderson is part of Union Township, Madison County, Indiana, United States.
Ann Arbor, Michigan has a population density of 1580.7 inhabitants per square
Atlanta is located in the United States where African Americans are an ethnic group.
Atlanta is part of Fulton County, Georgia, U.S.
Attica is part of Indiana, in the United States.
Auburn, Alabama is located in the United States where Washington D.C.
Auburn, Alabama is located in the United States where Asian Americans are an
Austin, Texas has a total area of 703.95 square kilometres and a total area
Austin is part of Travis County, Texas in the United States.
The city manager is the leader of Austin, Texas, United States.
Austin is part of Texas in the United States.
Indianapolis is the capital of Indiana, where the capital is Indianapolis.
Ann Arbor is part of Michigan in the United States.
Arlington is part of Texas where English is spoken.
The United States is the location of Albuquerque, New Mexico, where Americans are
Akron, Ohio is part of the United States where Asian Americans are an 
The comic character Asterix was created by Albert Uderzo and René Goscinny 
The alternative name of Aurakles is Aurakles which was created by Len Wein
The comic character Ballistic (also known as Kelvin Mao) was created by
Graeme Garden starred in Bananaman which was broadcast by the BBC / 
Bill Oddie, who was born in Lancashire, starred in Bananaman.
Bibbo Bibbowski was created by Jerry Ordway, a US national.
The Black Pirate, whose alternative name is Jon Valor, was created by Sheldon Mold
The comic character Blockbuster was created by Roger Stern and Tom Lyle.
The comic character Bolt was created by Paris Cullins <T> and Gary Cohn
Bread is an ingredient in Ajoblanco, which is from Spain which is a
Almond is an ingredient of Ajoblanco which is from Andalusia.
Tomato is an ingredient in Amatriciana sauce which comes from Lazio 
The Antioquia Department is located in Colombia where Bandeja paisa is a dish from
Banana leaf is an ingredient in Arem-arem which is a dish
Olive oil is an ingredient in Arrabbiata sauce which is from Italy which is
Arrabbiata sauce comes from Italy where Rome is the capital.
Arrabbiata sauce is a traditional dish from Italy. Tomato is a
Arròs negre is a traditional dish from Spain which has squid
Cuttlefish is an ingredient in Arros negre which is from the Valencian Community
The main ingredients of Ayam penyet are "squeezed" or "smashed
Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where sausage is an ingredient.
The Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where John Roberts is a leader
Bacon Explosion is a main course and contains bacon which is a
Bread is an ingredient in a bacon sandwich which has the alternative name of
Christmas pudding is an ingredient in Baked Alaska which comes from France, United
Baked Alaska is from China where Standard Chinese is spoken.
Baked Alaska is a dessert which can be varied by cookie.
The main ingredients of Bakewell pudding are ground almond, jam, butter and 
The variation of Bakewell pudding is Bakewell tart which has shortcrust pastry
The ingredient of Bandeja paisa is lemon which is a genus of Citrus.
Batchoy is a dish from the Philippines where shrimp is an ingredient.
Batchoy comes from the Philippines where Chinese Filipino are an ethnic group
Beef kway teow is a dish from Singapore where Standard Chinese is spoken
Beef kway teow is a dish from Singapore which is led by Tony
Bhajji is from India which is led by Sumitra Mahajan.
Bhajji is similar to Pakora and other fritters made from wheat or corn flo
The main ingredients of binignit are sweet potatoes and banana.
The main ingredients of binignit are sweet potatoes and sago.
Binignit contains sweet potato which is part of flowering plant.
The main ingredient of binignit is sweet potato which is part of the order Solan
Granola is an ingredient of Bionico which is a dessert.
Bionico is a dessert which can be varied by honey < TSP.
Ice cream <T> Bionico is a dessert.
Peanut sauce is a variation of Siomay which contains peanut
The A-Rosa Luna has a length of 125800.0 millimetres and was christ
The A-Rosa Luna has a cruise ship which is 125800.0 millimetres long
The AIDAluna is operated by AIDA Cruises which is located in Ro
The christening date of the AIDAstella is March 16th 2013, 253260.0 milli
The ALCO RS-3 has a four-stroke engine and was built by Montreal Loc
The ALV X-1 is manufactured by Alliant Techsystems which manufactures the 
The AMC Matador was designed by Richard A. Teague which is a
The AMC Matador was designed by Richard A. Teague which is a
The ARA Veinticinco de Mayo (V-2) has a length of 192000.0
The Abarth 1000 GT Coupe was manufactured by Gruppo Bertone 's 
Honda is the manufacturer of the Acura TLX which has a Honda J engine.
The Acura TLX has a Inline-four engine and is manufactured by Honda
The icebreaker Aleksey Chirikov was built in Finland which is led by
The icebreaker Aleksey Chirikov was built by Arctech Helsinki Shipyard and
The Alfa Romeo 164, assembled in Milan, is related to the Fiat Crom
The Alhambra has a Humphrys, Tennant and Dykes which is 
The Alhambra was launched on 31st May 1855 and has a ship beam
The Alvis Speed 25 has a single plate clutch, separate 4-speed gearbox
The AMC Matador is manufactured by American Motors, which was succeeded by Eagle
The Antares rocket was launched from the Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport Launch Pad 0
The Antares rocket was launched from the Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport on the 9
The Ariane 5 is manufactured by Airbus Defence and Space which is parent company
The Aston Martin V8 is related to the Aston Martin RHAM/1 /
The Atlas II was manufactured by Lockheed Martin and launched from Cape Canaveral Air Force
The Audi A1 is manufactured by Audi which is subsidiary of Ducati.
The Audi A1 is related to the SEAT Ibiza.
Douglas R Oberhelman is a key person at Caterpillar Inc. which has the
The Atatürk Monument in Izmir, Turkey was inaugurated on 27 July 1932.
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army
The native name of the Baku Turkish Martyrs Memorial is Turk Sehitleri A
Dead Man's Plack is made of rock and dedicated to Æthelwald
Aaron S. Daggett fought in the Battle of Fredericksburg and was award
Aaron S. Daggett fought in the Battle of Gettysburg which was
Abdul Taib Mahmud was born in the Kingdom of Sarawak and is a member
Abdul Taib Mahmud was born in Miri, Malaysia and is a member of the
Abdulsalami Abubakar served in the Nigerian Army and was in office while
Abdulsalami Abubakar was born in Minna and worked as the Chief of the
Abdulsalami Abubakar was born in Niger State and worked as the Chief of the
Abel Caballero was born in Ponteareas, Galicia, Spain.
Abner W. Sibal served in the United States Army and fought in World
Abner W. Sibal served in the United States Army which fought in
Abraham A. Ribicoff was born in the United States where he was married to
Casey Ribicoff, who was born in Chicago, was married to Casey Rib
Adam Koc fought in the Polish–Soviet War which was awarded the Cross of
Adam Koc fought in World War I which was awarded the Officers Star Parasol
Adam Koc fought in World War I which was awarded the Virtuti Militari.
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Greece where he worked as the deputy 
Adonis Georgiadis was in office while Konstantinos Mitsotakis was Prime Minister.
Adonis Georgiadis was in office while Antonis Samaras was Prime Minister and Konstantinos
Airey Neave, who started his career on 30th June 1953, ended his
Airey Neave started his career on 30th June 1953 and fought in World War
Airey Neave, who was born in Knightsbridge, fought in World War II
Airey Neave fought in World War II where Joseph Stalin was a commander
Albert B. White was succeeded by William M O Dawson and died in Parkersburg
Albert Jennings Fountain was in office while Edmund J. Davis was Vice President and
Alberto Teisaire died in Buenos Aires which is led by Diego Santilli
Alfons Gorbach was born in Tyrol, Austria.
Alfons Gorbach was born in Austria and was in office while Adolf Scharf was
Alfred N. Phillips, who was born in Darien, Connecticut, worked
Alfred N. Phillips served in the United States Army which fought in
Allan Shivers worked as a member of the Texas State Senate from District 4
Alvah Sabin worked as the Secretary of State of Vermont which was succeeded
A.C. Cesena play in Serie B which has Carpi FC 1909 as
A.C. Chievo Verona's ground is Stadio Marc Antonio Bentegodi 
The ground of A.C. Lumezzane is located in Italy where Pietro
A.D. Isidro Metapan is managed by Jorge Humberto Rodríguez, who
A.E Dimitra Efxeinoupolis has 1500 members and plays in the A EPS
The manager of A.F.C. Blackpool is Stuart Parker (footballer)
The manager of A.F.C. Blackpool is Stuart Parker (footballer)
The ground of A.F.C. Fylde is The Fylde which has 3
The ground of A.F.C. Fylde is Bryning Lane and has 3180
A.S. Livorno Calcio is managed by Christian Panucci who plays for
A.S. Roma play in Serie A and play in the Serie A.
ACF Fiorentina play in Serie A which is in Italy.
Frank de Boer played for Ajax Youth Academy and plays for Ajax Youth
AFC Ajax has 53502 members and is owned by AFC Ajax N.
AFC Ajax (amateurs)'s ground is Amsterdam which is led by Eber
AFC Ajax (amateurs) has 5000 members and played in the Topklasse 
AZAL Arena is located in Shuvalan <TSP and plays for the AZAL
The full name of AZ Alkmaar is Alkmaar Zaanstreek which has 17023 members
Agremiacao Sportiva Arapiraquense's ground is Estádio Municipal Coaracy
The full name of Agremiação Sportiva Arapiraquense is "Agremiação
Akron Summit Assault's ground is Akron, Ohio, United States.
Massimo Drago plays for S.S. Chieti Calcio which is managed
The Acharya Institute of Technology's campus is in Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr.
The Acharya Institute of Technology was given the 'Technical Campus' status by the All
The Acharya Institute of Technology offered tennis which is governed by the International Tennis Federation
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University is affiliated with the European
The Arabian Sea is the Arabian Sea of Karnataka in the state of Karnataka.
1634: The Bavarian Crisis, written by Virginia DeMarce and Eric F
Eric Flint is the author of 1634: The Ram Rebellion which is available in
Eric Flint is the author of 1634: The Ram Rebellion which is available in
ACM Transactions on Information Systems (abbreviated to ACM Trans. Inf.
The AIDS journal is published in the United Kingdom which is led by Elizabeth II.
A Fortress of Grey Ice, written by J.V. Jones, has the ISBN
A Glastonbury Romance is available in print and has the ISBN number 0-7156-
A Glastonbury Romance has the ISBN number 0-7156-3648-0 and is available
A Glastonbury Romance has 1174 pages and is available in print.
A Long Long Way has the ISBN number 0-670-03380-4 and the OCLC number 5
A Loyal Character Dancer is published in the United States where Asian Americans are
A Loyal Character Dancer is published by Soho Press which is in the United
Diane Duane is the author of A Wizard of Mars which has the OCLC
A Wizard of Mars has the ISBN number 978-0-15-204770-2 and is available in hardcover
A Wizard of Mars has 560 pages and has the ISBN number 978-0-15-204770-2.
Above the Veil was preceded by Aenir and was preceded by Aenir
Above the Veil, written in English, is followed by Above the Veil.
Above the Veil was preceded by Aenir which was preceded by Castle.
The Acta Mathematica Hungarica is published by Springer Science & Business Media (
The Administrative Science Quarterly (abbreviated to Admin. Sci. Q) has the
The Administrative Science Quarterly is published by Cornell University which is affiliated
Aenir, written by Garth Nix, has the ISBN number 0-439-
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians is available in hardcover using the ISBN number
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians has 320 pages and has the ISBN number 0-43
The academic discipline of HIV is HIV which is part of the Orthoretrovirinae
A Fortress of Grey Ice is from the United States where English is spoken.
Abilene Regional Airport serves the city of Abilene, Taylor County, Texas,
Adirondack Regional Airport serves the city of Lake Placid and Saranac Lake, New
Adolfo Suárez Madrid-Barajas Airport is located in Madrid which is
The Indian Air Force is the operating organisation for Agra Airport which is located in India
The United States Air Force is the operating organisation for Al Asad Airbase which is
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Alderney airport serves Alderney and serves the city of Alderney. The 1st
Alpena County Regional Airport is located in Wilson Township, Alpena County, Michigan and
Amsterdam Airport Schiphol is -3.3528 above sea level and serves the city of Amsterdam
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas, United States. Houston is the largest city
Angola International Airport is located in Ícolo e Bengo, Angola, 
Angola International Airport is located in Ícolo e Bengo, Angola, 
The Flemish Government is the operating organisation for Antwerp International Airport which is 12 
The Flemish department of Mobility and Public Works is the operating organisation for Antwerp International
Appleton International Airport serves Appleton, Wisconsin, which is part of Little Chute
Appleton International Airport is located in Greenville, Clayton, Winnebago County,
Ardmore Airport (New Zealand)'s 3rd runway surface type is Poaceae 
Ashgabat International Airport is 211 metres above sea level and has a runway
Athens International Airport serves the city of Athens, Greece, where Alexis Tsipras
The Atlantic City International Airport is located in Egg Harbor Township, New Jersey, United States
Antwerp International Airport serves the city of Antwerp, Belgium. The leader of Belgium is
The 2nd runway at Ardmore Airport (New Zealand) is made of Poaceae,
Aaron Bertram is associated with Kids Imagine Nation and Suburban Legends which
Aaron Deer is from Indiana, United States. He performs indie rock music.
Black metal musician Aaron Turner is associated with the band Twilight and Greymachine.
Drone musician Aaron Turner is associated with the band Twilight and Greymachine.
Black metal musician Aaron Turner is associated with the band Twilight and Sumac.
Aaron Turner plays black metal music for Sumac. Death metal is a fusion of
Aaron Turner plays electric guitar which is a black metal musician. Death metal
Abradab performs hip hop music which has the sub genre Gangsta rap. Drum and
Warner Music Group is the record label of Ace Wilder, who was born in Sweden,
The solo singer Agustin Barboza is a solo singer who plays Guarania
Agustin Barboza was born in Asuncion, Paraguay on 5 May 1913.
Ahmet Ertegun is a blues musician from Washington D.C. in the
Al Anderson, a member of the band NRBQ, began his career in 1966.
Alan Frew plays rock music which has its stylistic origins in folk music.
Albennie Jones, who was born in Errata, Mississippi, performs jazz music
Albennie Jones plays jazz music which has its stylistic origins in blues and
Pop musician Aleksandra Kovac is associated with Bebi Dol and Kornelije Kova
Rhythm and blues musician Aleksandra Kovac is associated with Bebi Dol and K
Rhythm and blues musician Aleksandra Kovac is associated with Bebi Dol and Korn
Alfred Garth Jones was born in Manchester, England and died in London.
Alfred Garth Jones was born in Manchester, United Kingdom where he died in London
Alfred Garth Jones died in Sidcup, London, which is led by Boris
Alfredo Zitarrosa is a solo singer and has a background as 
Alison O'Donnell is signed to the record label Static Caravan Recording
Allen Forrest was born in Fort Campbell, KY and raised in Dothan, AL.
Anders Osborne is associated with Tab Benoit and Voice of the Wetlands All-Stars
Anders Osborne's record label is Alligator Records which is signed to Okeh
Rhythm and blues singer Andra is associated with Puya and CRBL.
Disco is a derivative of rhythm and blues which is a solo singer
Andrew Rayel is associated with Jwaydan Moyine and Christian Burns. House music
Armin van Buuren is a House musician associated with Jwaydan Moyine
Alan Bean was a crew member of Apollo 12 which was operated by NASA.
Alan Shepard died on July 21st 1998 in California, where Dianne F
Edwin E. Aldrin, Jr. is a crew member of Apollo 11 
Buzz Aldrin, who was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey, was a crew
The US Navy awarded the Distinguished Service Medal in the United States Navy. Alan
Elliot See was selected by NASA in 1962 and died on 28 February 1966 in St
Elliot See was born on 23rd July 1927 in Dallas.
William Anders was born in British Hong Kong on 17th October 1933. He was 
Aaron Boogaard, who plays for Wichita Thunder, was born in Regina,
Aaron Hunt plays for VfL Wolfsburg and SV Werder Bremen II 
Aaron Hunt plays for VfL Wolfsburg and SV Werder Bremen youth
Abel Hernandez, who plays for Central Español, plays for U.S. C
Ahmad Kadhim Assad plays for the Iraq national football team which is managed
Akeem Ayers, who formerly played for the Tennessee Titans,
Akeem Ayers, who formerly played for the St. Louis Rams,
Akeem Ayers' debut team was the Tennessee Titans and his debut team was
Akeem Dent was born in Atlanta, Georgia on 27 September 1987. He made his
Akeem Priestley was born in Jamaica where Patrick Allen and Elizabeth II are
Alaa Abdul Zahra plays for Al Shorta SC and Al-Khor Sports Club
Alaa Abdul Zahra plays for Shabab Al-Ordon Club and Al Kha
Alan Martin, who was born on 1st January 1989, plays for Aldershot Town
Alan Martin, who was born on 1st January 1989, plays for Hamilton Academic
Aleksander Barkov Jr. was born in Tampere, Finland on September 2, 1995.
Aleksander Barkov Jr. was born on September 2, 1995 and plays for the Florida 
Aleksander Barkov Jr. was born in Tampere, Finland on 2nd September 1995.
Aleksandr Prudnikov was born on 24 February 1989 and plays for FC Dynamo Moscow
Aleksandr Prudnikov, who was born on 24 February 1989, plays for FC Spartak
Aleksandre Guruli plays for Olympique Lyonnais which play at Parc Olympique Lyon
Alessio Romagnoli plays for A.C. Milan which is managed by Sin
Alex Plante was born in Manitoba in 1989. He plays for Anyang Halla
Alex Tyus plays for Maccabi Ashdod B.C. which is coach
Alex Plante was born in Canada where the anthem is O Canada which is led
Aleksandr Chumakov plays for FC Torpedo Moscow which is managed by Valer
Luis Miguel Ramis is the manager of Real Madrid Castilla which is managed by Luis
Akeem Adams plays for United Petrotrin F.C. whose home ground is
11 Diagonal Street is located in South Africa, where Cyril Ramaphosa is
11 Diagonal Street is located in South Africa, where Jacob Zuma is the leader
11 Diagonal Street is located in South Africa, where Jacob Zuma is the leader
200 Public Square is located in Cleveland, which is led by Frank G Jackson.
250 Delaware Avenue is located in Buffalo, New York, Erie County, New
300 North LaSalle is located in Chicago, which is led by Rahm Emanuel
HOK SVE was the architect of 3Arena in Dublin which was completed in December
The 3Arena is located in Dublin, which was designed by the Populous company
Live Nation Entertainment is the owner of 3Arena which is located in Dublin, Republic of
The architect of AC Hotel Bella Sky Copenhagen is 3XN and it is located in Denmark
James Pain was the architect of Adare Manor which was completed in 1862 and
The current tenants of Addis Ababa City Hall are the Government of Addis A
Adisham Hall is located in Sri Lanka which was completed in 1931. The Tudo
The Akita Museum of Art was inaugurated on 28th September 2013 and has 3 floors
The Akita Museum of Art is located in Akita Prefecture, Akita, Akita
The College of William and Mary is the owner of Alan B. Miller Hall which was 
The College of William and Mary, whose chancellor is Robert Gates, is the owner
The Mason School of Business is the current tenant of Alan B Miller Hall in Virginia,
The College of William and Mary is the owner of Alan B. Miller Hall in Williamsburg,
Ampara Hospital is located in the Ampara District of Sri Lanka which has 476 beds
Ampara Hospital is located in the Eastern Province of Sri Lanka which is led by
Asher and Mary Isabelle Richardson House was constructed in 1911 and was added to
Asilomar Conference Grounds, located in Pacific Grove, California, was added to
Asser Levy Public Baths are located at Asser Levy Place and East 23
Asser Levy Public Baths are located in New York City, Manhattan, United States
T S Thakur and Sumitra Mahajan are leaders in India where Amdavad ni G
The celestial body known as (410777) 2009 FD has an orbital period of 394
(66063) 1998 RO1 has a minimum temperature of -71.0 degree celsius
The celestial body known as (66391) 1999 KW4 has an average speed of
1001 Gaussia, formerly known as 1923 OAA907 XC, has an 
101 Helena was discovered by James Craig Watson, who originated from Canada, 
1036 Ganymed was discovered by Walter Baade, a German national, who
The celestial body known as 103 Hera has an escape velocity of 0.0482
The celestial body known as 103 Hera has an escape velocity of 0.0482
E Wells discovered 107 Camilla which has an epoch date of December 31
N.R. Pogson, who was born in Nottingham, discovered 107 Camill
1097 Vicia has an epoch date of 31 December 2006 and an apoapsis of
The celestial body known as 1097 Vicia has an escape velocity of 0.0112
1099 Figneria has an escape velocity of 0.0155 kilometres per second and
The celestial body known as 10 Hygiea has a surface area of 837
The celestial body known as 1101 Clematis has an epoch date of
The celestial body known as 110 Lydia has an orbital period of 142603000.0
Abilene, Texas is 524.0 above sea level and has a population density
Abilene is part of Texas which is part of the United States. The capital of
Albany is part of Dougherty County, Georgia in the United States where African American
Albany is part of Linn County, Oregon, United States.
The New Mexico House of Representatives which leads Albuquerque, New Mexico,
The Albuquerque City Council, which is led by Richard J Berry, is located
Alpharetta is part of Georgia in the United States where African Americans are an ethnic
Amarillo is part of Randall County, Texas, in the United States.
The Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States where Amarillo is
The Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States where Amarillo is
Anaheim is part of Orange County, California which is part of the Greater Los Angeles
Anaheim is part of Orange County, California which is led by the United States House of
Angola is part of Steuben County, Indiana, in the United States, where
The total area of Atlanta is 347.1 square kilometres and it has a population density
Atlanta is part of Georgia in the United States where African Americans are an ethnic group
Atlanta is part of DeKalb County in Georgia, United States.
Auburn is part of Lee County, Alabama, United States.
Auburn is part of Washington state in the United States, where Olympia is the capital.
Austin, Texas is located in the United States where African Americans are an ethnic
Anderson is part of Madison County, Indiana, in the United States.
Anderson is the largest city in Madison County, Indiana, United States.
Washington DC is the capital of the United States where Abilene is part of Jones County
Washington DC is the capital of the United States where Abilene is part of Taylor County
Washington, D.C. is the capital of the United States, where Albany is
Washington, D.C. is the capital of the United States, where Auburn is
The African Americans are an ethnic group in the United States where English is spoken
The Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the United States where English is spoken
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States where Barack Obama is
Angola, Indiana is in the United States where English is spoken and Asian Americans
The United States House of Representatives is part of the United States Congress which is part
The comic character Auron was created by Walt Simonson and American Karl Kesel.
Tony Hall, Baron Hall of Birkenhead is a key person at the BBC 
Bill Oddie starred in Bananaman which was first aired on 3 October 1983
Baymax first appeared in Big Hero 6 and was created by Duncan Rouleau
Bibbo Bibbowski, full name Bibbo, was created by Marv Wolfman
The comic character Blockbuster, also known as Roland Desmond, was created by
The comic character Bolt, also known as Larry Bolatinsky, was created by
The comic character Bolt, also known as Larry Bolatinsky, was created by
Bread is an ingredient in Ajoblanco, which is also known as Ajo blanco,
Ajoblanco is a dish from Andalusia, Spain where water is an ingredient.
Arem-arem is a food found in Indonesia which is led by Jusuf
Arem-arem is a food found nationwide in Indonesia, but more specific to
Arrabbiata sauce comes from Italy where the leader is Sergio Mattarella.
Chili pepper is an ingredient of Arrabbiata sauce which comes from Rome,
Arrabbiata sauce, which contains garlic, comes from Rome, Italy
Arròs negre is a traditional dish from the Catalonia region of Spain.
Cuttlefish is an ingredient in Arros negre which is from the Valencian Community
Asam pedas is a dish from Sumatra and Malay Peninsula in Malaysia. The
The main ingredients of Ayam penyet are "squeezed" or "smashed
Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where the main ingredients are bacon
Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where the capital is Washington D.C
Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where Barack Obama is a leader
The Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where John Roberts is a leader
The BLT is a variation of the bacon sandwich which comes from
Meringue is an ingredient in Baked Alaska which comes from the region of New
Sponge cake is an ingredient in Baked Alaska which comes from New York,
Christmas pudding is an ingredient in Baked Alaska.
Christmas pudding is an ingredient in Baked Alaska which is a dessert. Sa
Bandeja paisa is a Colombian dish from the Antioquia Department region. Kidney Bean
Barny cakes can be found in France where the leaders are Gerard Larcher and
Barny cakes, which can be varied by Apple, contain 1.8g of protein
Beef kway teow is a dish from Singapore where Halimah Yacob is
Oyster sauce is an ingredient of Beef kway teow which is a
Beef kway teow is a dish from Indonesia which is led by Tony
The main ingredients of Bhajji are gram flour, vegetables and gram flour
Bhajji comes from India where the leader is T S Thakur.
Bhajji comes from India where the leaders are T S Thakur and Narendra Modi
The main ingredients of Bhajji are gram flour and vegetables. It is 
The main ingredient of binignit is sweet potato which is a dish from the Philippines
Sour cream is an ingredient in Bionico which is a dessert from Mexico.
Bionico is a food found in the Jalisco region of Mexico which has raisin
Celery is part of the Apiaceae family of Apiaceae.
Granola is an ingredient of Dessert which is a dessert.
Jusuf Kalla is the leader of Indonesia where Jakarta is the capital and Bakso is
Baduy is an ethnic group in Java where Ayam penyet is a
Banyumasan people are an ethnic group in Java where the Banyumasan people are
Spanish is spoken in Spain where Felipe VI is the leader. Arròs
The 1955 Dodge has a V8 engine and a hardtop body style. The
The 1955 Dodge has a V8 engine and a 3-speed automatic transmission. It
The A-Rosa Luna is a cruise ship with a length of 125800.0
The AIDAstella, owned by Costa Crociere, is operated by AIDA Cruise
The ALCO RS-3 has a cylinder count of 12 cylinders and is 
ALV X-1 originated from the United States where African Americans are an ethnic
The AMC Matador, assembled in Kenosha, Wisconsin, is related to the
The AMC Matador, assembled in Port Melbourne, Victoria, is related to the
The Abarth 1000 GT Coupe was designed by Gruppo Bertone which was found
The icebreaker Aleksey Chirikov was built at the Arctech Helsinki Shipyard
The Alfa Romeo 164 is related to the Lancia Thema and is assembled in
The Alfa Romeo 164 is related to the Fiat Croma and Lancia Thema
The Alhambra has a ship beam of 8.3m and is 63800.0 millimetres long
The Alvis Speed 25 was manufactured by the Alvis Car and Engineering Company which was
The AMC Matador was manufactured by American Motors which has Roy D Chapin Jr
The Antares rocket, manufactured by Yuzhnoye Design Office, was launched
The ARA Veinticinco de Mayo (V-2) is located in Argentina, where
The Aston Martin V8, assembled in Newport Pagnell, Buckinghamshire,
The Aston Martin V8 is related to the Aston Martin DBS which is
The Aston Martin V8 is related to the Aston Martin RHAM/1 which
The Atlas II originated from the United States, where the leader is called the President
The Audi A1 has a 1.2 litre engine and is assembled by Audi Brussels
The Audi A1, manufactured by Audi, is related to the SEAT Ibiza
The AIDAluna is powered by Caterpillar Inc. which was founded in California
Douglas R Oberhelman is a key person at Caterpillar Inc. which is 
The Guiana Space Centre, which has its headquarters in Kourou, French Gui
The Ariane 5 was launched at the Guiana Space Centre which is located in
White Americans are an ethnic group in the United States where the ALV X-1
The 11th Mississippi Infantry Monument is located in Adams County, Pennsylvania. Franklin County
The leader of Azerbaijan is Artur Rasizade. The Baku Turkish Martyrs'
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is designed by Hüseyin Bütün
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is known as Turk Sehitleri Aniti
Aaron S. Daggett, who was born in Maine, was awarded the
Ab Klink was born in the Netherlands and graduated from Erasmus University Rotterdam which
Abdul Taib Mahmud, who was born in the Kingdom of Sarawak, resides
Miri, Malaysia is the birthplace of Abdul Taib Mahmud, who resides in
Abdulsalami Abubakar was in office while Mike Akhigbe was Vice President. Oladipo
Olusegun Obasanjo was succeeded by Olusegun Obasanjo while Mike
Abdulsalami Abubakar, who was in office while Atiku Abubakar was Vice President
Abel Caballero was born in Galicia, Spain where he worked as the Minister of Transport
Abel Caballero was born in Galicia in Spain and was in office while Juan Carlos I of
Abner W. Sibal served in the United States Army and fought in World
Casey Ribicoff was married to Casey Ribicoff which was born in
Adam Holloway was born in Kent and graduated from Magdalene College Cambridge.
Adam Koc fought in the Polish–Soviet War and was awarded the Order of Polonia
Adam Koc, who was born in Congress Poland, fought in the Polish–Soviet War
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Athens, Greece, Greece. He worked as
Agnes Kant was born in West Germany and graduated from Radboud University Nijmegen
Agnes Kant, who was born in Hessisch Oldendorf, worked at Radboud
Agnes Kant is a national of the Netherlands which is led by Mark Rutte.
Airey Neave fought in the Battle of France and was awarded the Order of the
Airey Neave fought in the Battle of France and ended his career on March 4
Airey Neave, who fought in World War II, was awarded the Military
Albert Jennings Fountain was born in Staten Island, United States where he died
Alfons Gorbach was born in Imst, County of Tyrol. He died in
Alfons Gorbach was born in Imst, Tyrol state, which died in
Allan Shivers was a member of the Texas State Senate from District 4 (Port
Alvah Sabin was born in Georgia, Vermont on 23rd October 1793. He
Alvah Sabin was born in Georgia, Vermont and was a member of the Whig
Alfred Moore Scales fought in the Battle of Fredericksburg which was part of
Alfons Gorbach was born in Austria-Hungary which is led by Doris Bures
Alfons Gorbach was born in Imst and died in Austria. The leader of Austria
Aaron S Daggett fought in the Battle of Cold Harbor which was part of
Adam Koc is a national of Poland where the ethnic group is Kashubians.
A.C. Cesena's ground is Cesena which has 23900
Massimo Drago manages A.C. Cesena and plays for S.S
A.C. Lumezzane has 4150 members and played in the Lega Pro/
A.D. Isidro Metapan's full name is Isidro Metapan, who
A.E Dimitra Efxeinoupolis is located in Greece, where Niko
The manager of A.F.C. Blackpool is Stuart Parker (footballer)
The manager of A.F.C. Blackpool is Stuart Parker (footballer)
The manager of A.F.C. Blackpool is Stuart Parker (footballer)
The full name of A.F.C. Fylde is "Association Football Club Fylde
A.S. Livorno Calcio is managed by Christian Panucci who plays for
Associazione Sportiva Roma S.p.A. is the full name of A.S
AEK Athens F.C. has 69618 members and play in the Superleague Greece
AFC Ajax (amateurs) has 5000 members and played in the Hoofdklasse of
Qarabag FK is the champions of AZAL PFK which play in the AZAL
The full name of AZ Alkmaar Zaanstreek is "Alkmaar Zaanstreek".
The manager of AZ Alkmaar is John van den Brom who plays for Vitesse Arnhem
Vila Nova Futebol Clube are the champions of the Campeonato Brasileiro Série
Agremiação Sportiva Arapiraquense play in the Campeonato Brasileiro Série
The ground of Akron Summit Assault is St Vincent-St Mary High School which
Akron Summit Assault has 3000 members and plays in the Premier Development League which
The ground of A.S. Gubbio 1910 is located in Italy, where
The ground of Olympic Stadium (Athens) is Olympic Stadium (Athens
The Accademia di Architettura di Mendrisio is located in Switzerland where Mario
The motto of the Acharya Institute of Technology is Nurturing Excellence and is located
The president of the Acharya Institute of Technology in Bangalore, India is B M Reddy.
The Acharya Institute of Technology, which was established in 2000, has the sport offer
The Ganges is a river in India which is the largest city in India.
Prime Minister Klaus Iohannis is the leader of Romania which is led by Prime Minister Klaus I
The latin name of the 1 Decembrie 1918 University is "Universitas Apulensis" 
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University was established in 1928 and has
1634: The Bavarian Crisis, written by Virginia DeMarce and Eric F
1634: The Bavarian Crisis was preceded by 1634: The Baltic War
Eric Flint is the author of 1634: The Ram Rebellion which has 512 pages
Eric Flint is the author of 1634: The Ram Rebellion which is available in
1634: The Ram Rebellion was written by Eric Flint, Virginia DeMarce
ACM Transactions on Information Systems (abbreviated to ACM Trans. Inf.
ACM Transactions on Information Systems (abbreviated to ACM Trans. Inf.
The AIDS journal is published by Lippincott Williams & Wilkins in the United Kingdom
The American Institute of Physics is the publisher of AIP Advances which is 
A T Charlie Johnson is the editor of AIP Advances which has the abbreviation
A Glastonbury Romance is available in hardcover and has the OCLC number 767983
A Long Long Way was followed by The Secret Scripture in English which is spoken
A Loyal Character Dancer is published by Soho Press in the United States where
A Loyal Character Dancer is published by Soho Press which is located in
The Library of Congress Classification of A Severed Wasp is PS3523.E55 S4
A Severed Wasp has 388 pages and has the ISBN number 0-374-26131-8.
Diane Duane is the author of A Wizard of Mars which is available in h
Diane Duane is the author of A Wizard of Mars which is available in h
Above the Veil was preceded by Aenir which was preceded by Castle.
Acta Mathematica Hungarica (abbreviated to Acta Math. Hungar) has
The Acta Mathematica Hungarica (abbreviated to Acta Math. Hungar)
Acta Palaeontologica Polonica, abbreviated to Acta Palaeontol
The Addiction journal (abbreviated to Addiction) has the ISSN number 0965
Aenir, written by Garth Nix, is available in print and has the
Aenir, written by Garth Nix, is available in print and has the
The American Journal of Mathematics, abbreviated to Am. J. Math, has the
The American Journal of Mathematics, abbreviated to Am. J. Math, was first
Sara Miller McCune is the founder of SAGE Publications which has the abbreviation
The AIDS journal is published by Lippincott Williams & Wilkins in the United Kingdom
A Fortress of Grey Ice is from the United States where Barack Obama is the leader
The book Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians comes from the United States where
Abilene Regional Airport serves the city of Abilene, Texas, United States.
Adolfo Suárez Madrid-Barajas Airport is located in Alcobendas,
Adolfo Suarez Madrid-Barajas Airport is located in Madrid, Paracuellos
Agra Airport is located in Uttar Pradesh which is part of Awadh and Bundel
Agra Airport is located in Uttar Pradesh which is part of Awadh and Bundel
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which uses the
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which uses the
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
The Pakistan Civil Aviation Authority is the operating organisation for Allama Iqbal International Airport
Alpena County Regional Airport is located at Maple Ridge Township, Alpena County,
Amsterdam Airport Schiphol is -3.3528 above sea level and serves the city of Amsterdam
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas, United States, where English is spoken
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas, United States, where Spanish is spok
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas, United States. Houston is the largest city
Angola International Airport is 159 metres above sea level in Icolo e Bengo
The Flemish Government is the operating organisation for Antwerp International Airport which is 12 
Appleton International Airport is located in Greenville, Wisconsin which is part of Ellington
Ardmore Airport (New Zealand) is 34 metres above sea level and has a
Ardmore Airport (New Zealand) is 34 metres above sea level and has a
Ashgabat International Airport is operated by Turkmenistan Airlines and is 211 metres above se
The Port Authority of New York and New Jersey is the operating organisation for Atlantic City International
ENAIRE is the operating organisation for Adolfo Suárez Madrid-Barajas Airport
The Atlantic City International Airport is located in Egg Harbor Township, New Jersey, United States
The 2nd runway at Ardmore Airport (New Zealand) is made of Poaceae,
Aaron Bertram is a Ska punk musician and plays for Kids Imagine Nation
Aaron Deer, a solo singer, is from Indianapolis, Indiana. He
Aaron Turner started performing in 1995 and is associated with Old Man Gloom and
Aaron Turner started performing in 1995 and is associated with the Lotus Eaters
Aaron Turner started performing in 1995 and is associated with Old Man Gloom and
Aaron Turner plays electric guitar for Twilight and Twilight. Death metal is a
Aaron Turner plays black metal music for Mamiffer and Mamiffer. Death metal is 
Solo singer Ace Wilder was born in Stockholm on 23rd July 1982.
Agustin Barboza, who was born in Asuncion, Paraguay, is a solo
Al Anderson, a member of the band NRBQ, was born in Windsor, 
Alan Frew plays rock music which has its stylistic origins in folk music.
Albennie Jones was born in 1914 in the United States and performs rhythm and blues
Albennie Jones is a solo singer of rhythm and blues which originated
Solo singer Aleksandra Kovac was born in Belgrade in 1972.
Solo singer Aleksandra Kovac was born in the Socialist Republic of Serbia in 1972.
Rhythm and blues solo singer Aleksandra Kovac was born in Belgrade in 1972.
Alex Day started performing in 2006 and is associated with the musical artist Charlie McD
Alex Day is a solo singer who performs Synthpop which originated from
Folk musician Alison O'Donnell started performing in 1963 and is associated
Jazz musician Alison O'Donnell is signed to Deram Records which is
Anders Osborne is associated with the musical artist Billy Iuso and Tab Benoit.
Anders Osborne is associated with Billy Iuso and Voice of the Wetlands All-
Andrew Rayel plays Trance music which originated from pop music. He is 
Andrew Rayel began his career in 2009 and is associated with Christian Burns and 
Andrew Rayel plays Trance music which originated from pop music. He is 
The musician Andrew White, who began his career in 2003, is associated with the
Juan Afara is the leader of Paraguay, where Asuncion is part of Gran Asun
The House musician Andrew Rayel is associated with artists: Armin van Buuren
The Labour Party (UK) is the leader of Manchester which is part of Greater
Alfredo Zitarrosa died in Montevideo, Uruguay, where Tabaré Vá
Alan Bean was a US national who served as a crew member of Apollo 12
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire on Nov 18, 1923. He graduated from
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire and served as a test pilot. He
Alan Shepard, who was born in New Hampshire, served as a test pilot
Alfred Worden was a backup pilot on Apollo 12 which was operated by
Buzz Aldrin is a US national who was born in Glen Ridge, Essex County,
Elliot See was born in Dallas on 23rd July 1927. He attended the University
Elliot See graduated from the University of Texas at Austin which was a test
Elliot See attended the University of Texas at Austin which is affiliated to the
Elliot See was born in Dallas on 23rd July 1927. He died in St
William Anders was a crew member of Apollo 8 which was commanded by Frank Bor
Abel Hernandez plays for Penarol and Hull City A.F.C. 
Abel Hernández plays for the youth team Peñarol which is managed by
Adam McQuaid's draft team is the Columbus Blue Jackets which are 
Akeem Ayers was born on 10th July 1989 and his debut team was the
Akeem Dent was born in Atlanta, Georgia on 27 September 1987. He former
Alaa Abdul Zahra plays for Shabab Al-Ordon Club and Al Kha
Alan Martin plays for Accrington Stanley F.C. which is managed by
Alan Martin, who was born on 1 January 1989, plays for Hamilton Academical
Alan Martin plays for Motherwell F.C. which is managed by Barry
Aleksandre Guruli plays for FC Dinamo Batumi which is managed by Le
Aleksandre Guruli plays for FC Karpaty Lviv and Olympique Lyonnais which
Alex Plante, who plays for Anyang Halla, was born in Brandon,
Alex Plante was born in Canada where the anthem is O Canada which is led
Aaron Boogaard was born in Canada, where the Slavey language is spoken
Barry Ferguson is the manager of Clyde F.C. which plays at
Aleksandre Guruli plays for FC Samtredia which is managed by Oleh
Aleksandr Tukmanov is the chairman of FC Torpedo Moscow who play in the 2014-15
Akeem Dent's debut team was the Atlanta Falcons which are owned
Aaron Hunt plays for SV Werder Bremen II and SV Werder Bremen II
11 Diagonal Street is located in South Africa which is led by Cyril Ramaphos
11 Diagonal Street is located in South Africa which has Cape Town as its capital and
200 Public Square is located in Cleveland, Cuyahoga County, Ohio. The
The postmodern architecture style of 250 Delaware Avenue was started in January 2014 and has
300 North LaSalle is located in Chicago, DuPage County, Illinois, United States.
3Arena is owned by Live Nation Entertainment which is located in Dublin, Republic of
3Arena is owned by Live Nation Entertainment which is located in Dublin, Republic of
The AC Hotel Bella Sky Copenhagen, which has 23 floors, is owned by Bella
The AC Hotel Bella Sky Copenhagen, which has 23 floors, is owned by Bella
Adisham Hall, which was completed in 1927, is located in Sri Lanka and
Adisham Hall is located in Haputale, Sri Lanka. Sri Jayawardenepura
Adisham Hall, Sri Lanka, was completed in 1927 and was completed in 1931.
The Akita Museum of Art is located in Akita, Akita, Akita Prefecture
The Mason School of Business is the current tenant of Alan B Miller Hall in Virginia,
The Mason School of Business is the current tenant of Alan B Miller Hall in Virginia,
The leader of India is Narendra Modi and Sumitra Mahajan. Amdavad ni Gufa
Amdavad ni Gufa is located at Lalbhai Dalpatbhai Campus, near CEPT
Amdavad ni Gufa is located in Ahmedabad, Gujarat, Gujarat, India
Ampara Hospital is located in the Eastern Province, Sri Lanka, where Ranil
The architect of Asilomar Conference Grounds was Julia Morgan, who was born in San Francisco
The architect of Asilomar Conference Grounds is Julia Morgan, who was born in California and
Asser Levy Public Baths are located in New York City, New York City,
The Labour politician John Clancy is the leader of Birmingham which has the postal code
Mulatu Teshome is the leader of Ethiopia which is part of Addis Ababa
Paul Ryan is the leader of the United States which has the capital city of Washington D.
The celestial body known as (19255) 1994 VK8 has an epoch date of
The celestial body known as (19255) 1994 VK8 has an orbital period of 
(66063) 1998 RO1 has an escape velocity of 0.0999 kilometres per second
The celestial body known as (66063) 1998 RO1 has an epoch date
Sergey Belyavsky discovered 1001 Gaussia which has an epoch date
101 Helena was discovered by James Craig Watson, a national of Canada, 
1036 Ganymed was discovered by Walter Baade, who was born in German 
1036 Ganymed was discovered by Walter Baade, who was born in Preuß
The Canadian James Craig Watson discovered 103 Hera which has an epoch
103 Hera was discovered by James Craig Watson, a national of Canada, 
E Wells discovered 107 Camilla, which has an epoch date of 31
N.R. Pogson, who was born in Nottingham, discovered 107 Camill
The celestial body known as 1097 Vicia has an epoch date of 31 December
1099 Figneria has an epoch date of 31 December 2006 and an orbital
Abilene is part of Texas in the United States where English is spoken. The
Albany is part of Georgia in the United States where African Americans are an ethnic
Albany is part of Georgia in the United States. English is the language of the United States
Albany, Oregon is part of Oregon which has the capital city of Salem. The
Albuquerque, New Mexico has a total area of 490.9 square kilometres and
Amarillo is part of Potter County, Texas, in the United States. The capital of the
Anaheim is part of Orange County, California, United States. Anaheim is led by the
Angola, Indiana is part of Pleasant Township, Steuben County, Indiana,
Angola is part of Steuben County, Indiana, in the United States, where
The UTC offset of Antioch, California is -7 and it has a total area
Attica, Indiana is part of Logan Township, Fountain County, Indiana, 
Attica, Indiana, is part of Logan Township, Fountain County, Indiana,
Attica, Indiana is part of Fountain County, Indiana, United States. It has 
Auburn is part of Lee County, Alabama, United States, where Asian Americans
Auburn is part of Pierce County, Washington, United States. It has a total
Auburn is part of Pierce County, Washington, in the United States. The capital of
Auburn is part of Pierce County, Washington in the United States. The capital of the
The population density of Austin, Texas is 1296.65 inhabitants per square kilometr
Contra Costa County is part of Contra Costa County, which is part of the San Francisco Bay
Indianapolis is the capital of Indiana, which is part of Adams Township, Madison
Indianapolis is the capital of Indiana, which is part of Lafayette Township, 
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States where Washington DC is the
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States which has the capital of
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States where the people are 
Akron, Summit County, Ohio is in the United States, where Asian American
Angola is part of Steuben County, Indiana in the United States where English is
The United States House of Representatives is part of the United States Congress, which is
Tim Brooke-Taylor is a creator of Bananaman which first aired on
The comic character Bolt was created by Dan Mishkin and Puerto Rican. The comic
Duncan Rouleau, a US national, is the creator of the character Big Hero
Duncan Rouleau, a US national, is the creator of the film Big Hero
Duncan Rouleau, a American, was the creator of the film Big Hero 6,
Bread, almonds, garlic, water and olive oil are the main ingredients of
Ajoblanco (also known as Ajo blanco) is a dish from Andalusia, Spain
The Javanese dish Arem-arem is a variation of Lemper which
Arem-arem is a main course in Indonesia, but more specific to Java.
The main ingredients of Arrabbiata sauce are Tomatoes, red chili, gar
The main ingredients of Arros negre are white rice, cuttlefish or 
The main ingredients of Arros negre are white rice, cuttlefish or 
The main ingredients of Arros negre are white rice, cuttlefish or 
Asam pedas is a dish from Sumatra and Malay Peninsula in Malaysia. The
Asam pedas is a food found in Sumatra, where the Minangkabau
Bacon Explosion is a dish from the Kansas City metropolitan area of Kansas
Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where Paul Ryan is a leader and
Bacon sandwiches are known as bacon butty, bacon sarnie,
Bacon sandwiches are known as bacon butty, bacon sarnie,
Bread and bacon sandwiches are popular in the United Kingdom. The main ingredients
The main ingredients of Baked Alaska are meringue, ice cream, s
The main ingredients of Baked Alaska are meringue, ice cream, s
Bakewell pudding is a variation of Bakewell pudding which is a
Bakewell pudding is a dessert from the Derbyshire Dales of Derbyshire
Bakewell pudding is a variation of Bakewell tart which is a 
The main ingredients of Bandeja paisa are red beans, pork belly, white
The main ingredients of Batagor are fried fish dumpling with tofu and vegetable
Batagor is a dish from Indonesia which is a variation of Siomay
Beef kway teow, beef tender loin, gula Melaka, slice
Beef kway teow, beef tender loin, gula Melaka, slice
Beef kway teow, beef tender loin, gula Melaka, slice
The main ingredients of bhajji are gram flour and vegetables. It is also
Bhajji is a dish from the region of Karnataka which is led by Vajubha
Bhajji is a dish from the region of Karnataka which is led by Vajubha
Bhajji originates from the region of Karnataka in India. The leader of India is T
The main ingredient of binignit is sweet potatoes which is a dish from the
The main ingredients of Bionico are chopped fruits, sour cream, condensed milk
Enrique Pena Nieto is the leader of Mexico, where Bionico is a dessert
Jusuf Kalla is the leader of Indonesia where Indonesian is spoken. Bakso
Amatriciana sauce is a traditional Italian sauce from Italy where the capital
Pietro Grasso and Sergio Mattarella are leaders of Italy where Amatriciana 
The Banyumasan people are an ethnic group in Java where English is spoken.
The Banyumasan people are an ethnic group in Java where Halimah Yacob is
Batchoy comes from the Philippines where the ethnic groups are Zamboangan
The Euro is the currency of Spain which is led by Felipe VI of Spain.
The 1955 Dodge has a V8 engine and a wheelbase of 120.0 
The 1955 Dodge is related to the DeSoto Custom which was succeeded by
The AIDAluna, powered by Caterpillar Inc., has a ship beam
The AIDAstella, built by Meyer Werft, has a ship beam of
The AIDAstella, built by Meyer Werft, is 253260.0 millimetres long
The AIDAstella, built by Meyer Werft, is 253260.0 millimetres long
The American Locomotive Company built the ALCO RS-3 which has a V12
The AMC Matador (also known as American Motors Matador) is assembled in
The AMC Matador (also known as American Motors Matador) is a mid
The AMC Matador, also known as VAM Classic, is a full-
The AMC Matador, also known as VAM Classic, is assembled in Tham
The Abarth 1000 GT Coupé has a two door coupe and a straight four
The Acura TLX is a luxury vehicle which is assembled at the Mary
The icebreaker Aleksey Chirikov was built by Arctech Helsinki Shipyard in
The icebreaker Aleksey Chirikov was built at the Arctech Helsinki Shipyard
The icebreaker Aleksey Chirikov was built in Helsinki, Finland. It has
The icebreaker Aleksey Chirikov was built in Helsinki, Finland, where
The Alfa Romeo 164, assembled in Italy, is related to the Saab 9000
The Alfa Romeo 164 is related to the Fiat Croma and Lancia Thema
The AMC Matador was manufactured by American Motors which was succeeded by Eagle.
The American submarine NR-1 has a top speed of 8.334 km/h and 
The Antares rocket, manufactured by Yuzhnoye Design Office, was launched
The Aston Martin V8 is related to the Aston Martin RHAM/1 and the
The Audi A1 has a 1.2 litre engine and a 5 speed manual transmission.
The Audi A1 is manufactured by Audi which was founded by August Horch.
The owner of AIDAluna is AIDA Cruises (located in Rostock) AIDA
Douglas R Oberhelman is a key person at Caterpillar Inc. which was found
The Delta II was launched from Cape Canaveral Air Force Station at Cape Canaveral Air Force
General Dynamics Electric Boat, located in Groton, Connecticut, is the parent company
The A-Rosa Luna was built by Neptun Werft which is located in Ro
The ALV X-1 originated from the United States which has the capital city of Washington
The 11th Mississippi Infantry Monument is located in Gettysburg, Adams County,
The 11th Mississippi Infantry Monument is categorised as a contributing property and
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army
Artur Rasizade is the leader of Azerbaijan where the National Assembly is the legislature
The leader of Azerbaijan is Artur Rasizade. The Baku Turkish Martyrs'
The Prime Minister of Azerbaijan is Artur Rasizade. The leader of Azerbaijan is Prime
Aaron S. Daggett was born in Maine and fought in the American Civil
Aaron S. Daggett was born in Maine and fought in the Battle of
Ab Klink was born in Stellendam and worked as a member of the House of
Abdul Taib Mahmud was born in Miri, Malaysia and resides in Kuching.
Abdul Taib Mahmud was born in the Kingdom of Sarawak and resides in De
Adenan Satem was born in the Japanese Occupation of British Borneo (
Adenan Satem was born in the Japanese Occupation of British Borneo and
Abel Caballero was born in Spain and was in office while Felipe Gonzalez was Prime Minister
Abel Caballero, who was born in Galicia, Spain, is a member of the 
Abel Caballero, who worked as Minister of Transport, was born in Ponteareas, 
Abner W. Sibal, who was born in Ridgewood, Queens, was a
Abraham A. Ribicoff was born in the United States and worked as the United States
Adam Holloway was born in Faversham Kent, England and served in the
Adam Koc, a national of Poland, fought in the Polish–Soviet War 
Adam Koc, a national of Poland, fought in the Polish–Soviet War 
Adam Koc was a national of Poland where Leon Trotsky was a commander.
Adam Koc was born in Congress Poland and fought in the Polish–Soviet War which
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Athens, Greece, Greece. He worked at
Adonis Georgiadis was in office while Antonis Samaras was Prime Minister and was suc
Airey Neave, who was born in Knightsbridge, fought in the Battle of
Airey Neave, who was born in Knightsbridge, fought in World War II
Albert B White was born on 22nd September 1856 in 1856. He died in
Albert Jennings Fountain was born in Staten Island and died in Dona Ana County,
Rear Admiral Alberto Teisaire was born in Mendoza, Argentina on May 20, 1891
Alfons Gorbach was born in Imst, Austria-Hungary. He died in Styr
Alfons Gorbach was born in Tyrol state in Austria-Hungary. He died in
Alfred N. Phillips was a member of the U.S. House of 
Allan Shivers, who was born in Lufkin, Texas, was a member
Alvah Sabin is a member of the Whig Party in the United States which is
Alvah Sabin was a member of Vermont's 3rd Congressional District which
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States where Abraham A Ribic
Associazione Calcio ChievoVerona S.r.l. is the full name of A
Rolando Maran, who was born in Italy, plays for Unione Triestina
Michele Marcolini, who was born in Italy, plays for Torino F.C
The A.E Dimitra Efxeinoupolis club is located in Greece, 
Associazione Sportiva Gubbio 1910 Srl is the full name of A.S
The full name of A.S. Gubbio 1910 is "Associazione Sportiva Gu
The full name of A.S. Livorno Calcio is Livorno Calcio S.
Associazione Sportiva Roma S.p.A. is the full name of A.S
Qarabag FK are the champions of the Azerbaijan Premier League which play in the 
Qarabag FK is the champions of AZAL PFK which play in the Azerbaijan
The manager of AZ Alkmaar is John van den Brom who plays for AFC Ajax
Agremiação Sportiva Arapiraquense play in the Campeonato Brasileiro Série
Vila Nova Futebol Clube are the champions of Campeonato Brasileiro Série C
The full name of Akron Summit Assault is "Akron Metro Futbol Club Summit
Akron Summit Assault's ground is in Akron, Ohio, United States
The ground of A.S. Gubbio 1910 is located in Italy, where
The ground of A.S. Gubbio 1910 is located in Italy, where
The full name of Associazione Sportiva Roma S.p.A. is "Associazione
The Accademia di Architettura di Mendrisio is located in Mendrisio,
The Federal Chancellor of Switzerland is the leader of Switzerland. The Accademia di Architettura
The Accademia di Architettura di Mendrisio is located in Mendrisio,
The Acharya Institute of Technology was given the 'Technical Campus' status by the All
The Acharya Institute of Technology is located in Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sar
The Acharya Institute of Technology in India was established in 2000 and is affiliated with
The 1 Decembrie 1918 University is located in Romania, where the leader is Klaus I
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University in Denmark is affiliated
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University in Denmark was established in
1634: The Bavarian Crisis was preceded by 1634: The Baltic War
Virginia DeMarce is the author of 1634: The Ram Rebellion which has 512
The AIDS journal is published by Lippincott Williams & Wilkins in the United Kingdom
A Fortress of Grey Ice, written by J.V. Jones, is available in
A Long Long Way was preceded by Annie Dunne, published by Viking Press (
A Severed Wasp is available in print and has the Library of Congress Classification PS3523.
A Severed Wasp is from the United States where African Americans are an ethnic
A Severed Wasp is available in hardcover and has 388 pages. The OCLC number
A Wizard of Mars, written by Diane Duane, is available in hardcover
The Addiction journal (abbreviated to Addiction) has the ISSN number 1360
The Administrative Science Quarterly is published by Cornell University in Ithaca, New
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians is from the United States which has the capital
The American Journal of Mathematics, abbreviated to Am. J. Math, is 
The American Journal of Mathematics, abbreviated to Am. J. Math, was first
A Loyal Character Dancer is published by Soho Press which is located in
A Severed Wasp is from the United States where English is spoken in Great 
The book Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians comes from the United States where
The AIDS journal is published by Lippincott Williams & Wilkins in the United Kingdom
A Fortress of Grey Ice is from the United States where one of the ethnic groups
A Fortress of Grey Ice is from the United States where one of the ethnic groups
A Severed Wasp is from the United States where Barack Obama is the leader and
Abilene Regional Airport serves the city of Abilene, Jones County, Texas,
Abilene Regional Airport serves Abilene, Texas and is 546 metres above se
Adolfo Suárez Madrid-Barajas Airport is located at 610 metres above
Ram Naik is the leader of Uttar Pradesh which is part of Bundelkhand.
Ram Naik is the leader of Uttar Pradesh which is part of Bundelkhand.
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
The Pakistan Civil Aviation Authority is the operating organisation for Allama Iqbal International Airport
The Pakistan Civil Aviation Authority is the operating organisation for Allama Iqbal International Airport
Andrews County Airport serves Andrews, Texas which is 973 metres above se
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas, United States, where the largest city
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas, where the largest city is Houston,
Angola International Airport is located in Icolo e Bengo, Luanda Province,
Angola International Airport is 159 metres above sea level in Icolo e Bengo
The Flemish department of Mobility and Public Works is the operating organisation for Antwerp International
The Appleton International Airport, located in Greenville, Wisconsin, is 280 meters above
Appleton International Airport is located in Greenville, Wisconsin, which is part of Clay
Ardmore Airport in New Zealand is operated by the Civil Aviation Authority of New Zealand
Ashgabat International Airport is operated by Turkmenistan Airlines and is 211 metres above se
The Port Authority of New York and New Jersey is the operating organisation for Atlantic City International
Antwerp International Airport serves the city of Antwerp, Belgium. The leader of Belgium is
Atlantic City International Airport is located in Egg Harbor Township, Atlantic County, New Jersey,
Adolfo Suárez Madrid-Barajas Airport is 610 metres above sea level
Aaron Bertram plays Ska punk which originated from punk rock. He is 
Aaron Deer is a solo singer of Indie rock which is associated with
Aaron Turner plays electric guitar for Mamiffer and House of Low Culture bands. Death
Aaron Turner plays electric guitar for Twilight and Greymachine. Death metal is a
Aaron Turner was born in Massachusetts and started performing in 1995. He is a
Abradab started his career in 1994 and is associated with the rapper Magik.
Solo singer Ace Wilder was born in Sweden on 23rd July 1982.
Agustin Barboza was born in Asuncion, Paraguay, where Spanish is spok
Ahmet Ertegun died in the United States where African Americans are an 
Ahmet Ertegun, who was born in 1923, is a non performing personnel
Alan Frew is a solo singer of rock music which has its stylistic origin
The solo singer Alan Frew was born in Coatbridge, Ontario, Canada. He
Alex Day, who was born in London Borough of Havering, started performing in
Alfred Garth Jones was born in Manchester, which is led by the European Parliament
Alfredo Zitarrosa is a solo singer with a background as a
Alison O'Donnell, who started performing in 1963, is associated with
Rhythm and blues musician Anders Osborne started performing in 1989 and is associated
Anders Osborne is a guitarist associated with Johnny Sansone and Johnny Sans
Rhythm and blues singer Andra was born in Romania in 1986.
Andra is a solo singer who was born in Câmpia Turzii in 1986.
Andrew Rayel was born in Chisinau, Moldova and began his career in 2009. He
The musician Andrew White, who began his career in 2003, is associated with the
The House musician Andrew Rayel is associated with artists: Armin Van Buuren
Allen Forrest's musical genre is hip hop music which has its origins in Funk
Spanish is the language spoken in Paraguay, where Agustin Barboza was born
Agustin Barboza was born in Paraguay and died in Asuncion (part of Gran
Bhangra is a fusion genre of rock music which has its stylistic origins
Aaron Turner plays electric guitar for Twilight and House of Low Culture. Death metal is
Alfredo Zitarrosa died in Montevideo, Uruguay, where Spanish is
Alfredo Zitarrosa died in Montevideo, Uruguay, where Daniel Martinez is
Alan Bean was born in Wheeler, Texas and served as a test pilot. He
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire on November 18, 1923. He graduated from
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire and graduated from NWC with a
Alan Shepard, who was born in New Hampshire, was a crew member of
Alfred Worden was a backup pilot of Apollo 12 which was operated by
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire on Nov 18, 1923. He was awarded the
Elliot See was born in Dallas and attended the University of Texas at Austin which is
Elliot See was born in Dallas (Texas) and attended the University of Texas at Austin
Elliot See was born in Dallas which is affiliated to the University of Texas system
Elliot See was born in Dallas and attended the University of Texas at Austin which is
William Anders retired on September 1st 1969. He was a crew member of Apollo
Akeem Dent debuted with the Atlanta Falcons which are owned by Arthur
Al Kharaitiyat SC play in the Qatar Stars League which is managed by Amar
Aleksandr Chumakov died in Russia, where the leader is Valentina Matviyenko
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Amkar Perm and FC Terek Grozny youth
Alessio Romagnoli plays for U.C. Sampdoria and A.C. Milan
Alessio Romagnoli, who plays for U.C. Sampdoria, currently play
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Spartak Moscow and FC Dynamo Moscow youth
Akeem Adams plays for United Petrotrin F.C. whose ground is Palo
Akeem Ayers debuted with the Tennessee Titans which are coached by
20 Fenchurch Street is located in the United Kingdom which has the capital city of London
The building of 250 Delaware Avenue, Buffalo, New York, was started in 
300 North LaSalle is located in Chicago, DuPage County, Illinois, United States.
Dáil Éireann is a leader in Dublin, which is part of Leinster
Adisham Hall, which was completed in 1927, is located at St. 
Adisham Hall is located in Haputale, Sri Lanka. Sri Lanka's capital
Adisham Hall is located in Haputale, Sri Lanka. Sri Jayawardenepura
The Akita Museum of Art is located in Akita, Akita Prefecture, Akita
Amdavad ni Gufa is located in Ahmedabad, Gujarat, Gujarat, India
Amdavad ni Gufa is located in Ahmedabad, Gujarat, India. The leader
Ampara Hospital is located in the Eastern Province of Sri Lanka where Austin Fernando
The architect of Asilomar Conference Grounds is Julia Morgan, who was born in California and
The architect of Asilomar Conference Grounds is Julia Morgan, who was born in California and
Asilomar Conference Grounds, constructed in 1913, are located in Pacific Grove,
Asser Levy Public Baths are located on 23rd Street (Manhattan)
The Asser Levy Public Baths are located in New York City, New York,
Andrew Mitchell is the leader of Birmingham, which has the B postcode area. Birmingham
The leaders of Ethiopia are Mulatu Teshome and Hailemariam Desalegn. Addi
The leader of the United States is the President of the United States where English is spoken
The leader of the United States is the President of the United States which is led by Joe
(66063) 1998 RO1, formerly known as 1999 SN5, has an
(66391) 1999 KW4 has an epoch date of 14th July 2004 and
101 Helena was discovered by James Craig Watson, a national of Canada, who
101 Helena was discovered by James Craig Watson, a national of Canada, who
1036 Ganymed was discovered by Walter Baade, who was born in German 
1036 Ganymed was discovered by Walter Baade, who was born in German 
107 Camilla, discovered by F Vilas, has an epoch date of 31
107 Camilla was discovered by N.R. Pogson who was born in 
1089 Tama, formerly known as A919 HA; 1927 WB, has an
The celestial body known as 1097 Vicia has an escape velocity of 0.0112
The celestial body known as 10 Hygiea has an epoch date of June
Abilene, Texas has a total area of 142 square kilometres and a
Abilene is part of Texas in the United States where the largest city is Houston
Albany is part of Georgia, in the United States, where English is spoken.
Albuquerque, New Mexico, has a total area of 490.9 square kilometres
The United States House of Representatives is located at the United States Capitol of 
The Democratic Party of the United States is headquartered in Washington, D.C.
Anderson, Indiana has a population density of 523.9 inhabitants per square kilometre
Antioch is part of Contra Costa County, California which is part of the San Francisco Bay
Attica is part of Fountain County, Indiana, in the United States. The capital of
Auburn is part of Lee County, Alabama, United States, where the capital is
Opelika is the county seat of Auburn, Lee County, Alabama, United
The county seat of Austin, Texas is Georgetown. Round Rock is the largest city
Austin is part of Williamson County, Texas, where the largest city is Houston.
Anderson is the largest city in Indiana in the U.S. Indianapolis is the capital
Arlington is part of Tarrant County, Texas, where the largest city is Houston
Arlington is part of Tarrant County, Texas, where Fort Worth is the 
Austin is the capital of Texas, where Houston is the largest city. Arlington is
The ethnic group of the United States are Asian Americans, which is led by 
Washington D.C. is the capital of the United States, where African Americans are
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States, where the capital is
The leader of the United States is the President of the United States, where African Americans
The Asian Americans are an ethnic group in the United States where English is spoken
English is the language of the United States, where Asian Americans are an ethnic group
Opelika is the county seat of the United States, where Native Americans
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States which is led by Ba
Angola is part of Indiana, in the United States, where English is spoken.
The leader of the United States is the President of the United States, where Asian Americans
Seattle is the largest city in Washington state, which is part of King County, Washington
Tim Brooke-Taylor is a starring in Bananaman which was created by
Duncan Rouleau, a US national, was created by Steven T Seagle and
Bread, almonds, garlic, water and olive oil are the main ingredients of
The main ingredients of Amatriciana sauce are tomatoes, guanciale,
Arem-arem is a Javanese dish from Indonesia where Joko Widodo
Arrabbiata sauce is a traditional sauce from Italy, where the capital
Arros negre is from the region of the Valencian Community which is led by X
Asam pedas is a food found in the Malay Peninsula of Malaysia, where
Asam pedas is a food found in the Malay Peninsula of Malaysia, where
The main ingredients of Ayam penyet are "squeezed" or "smashed
The main ingredients of Ayam penyet are "squeezed" or "smashed
The main ingredients of Ayam penyet are fried chicken and fried chicken
Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where Barack Obama is a leader
Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where Joe Biden is a leader
Carrie Lam and Gérard Larcher are leaders in France where Baked Alaska is
Bandeja paisa is a Colombian dish from the Paisa region. Lemon is a
Barny cakes are a traditional dish from France which is led by Gerard
Barny cakes are created by Mondelez International, which was founded in Chicago
Bhajji comes from the region of Karnataka in India. The leaders of India are T
Binignit is a dessert from the Visayas region of the Philippines. The main 
Enrique Pena Nieto is the leader of Mexico where Spanish is spoken. Bio
Bionico is a dessert from Mexico where the leader is Silvano Aureoles Con
Bionico is a dessert from the Guadalajara region of Mexico, where Silvano A
Joko Widodo is a leader in Indonesia where Indonesian is spoken and the
Joko Widodo and Jusuf Kalla are leaders of Indonesia, where Jakarta is the capital
Pietro Grasso and Laura Boldrini are leaders in Italy where Amatriciana sauce
The Banyumasan people are an ethnic group in Java where Halimah Yacob is
The Banyumasan people are an ethnic group in Java where Halimah Yacob is
Batchoy is a dish from the Philippines where the official language is Philippine English
Tony Tan and Halimah Yacob are leaders in Singapore where English is spoken.
Felipe VI of Spain is the leader of Spain which is led by Susana Diaz
Felipe VI of Spain is the leader of Spain, where the currency is the Euro
The AIDAstella, built by Meyer Werft, has a ship beam of
The ALCO RS-3 was built by the American Locomotive Company between May 1950 and
The AMC Matador (also known as American Motors Matador) is a mid
The Alhambra is owned by P&O and has a Humphrys, Ten
The Antares rocket, manufactured by Yuzhnoye Design Office, was launched
The Antares rocket, manufactured by Yuzhnoye Design Office, was launched
The Ariane 5 was manufactured by Airbus Defence and Space and launched from the
The European Space Agency is the manufacturer of the Ariane 5 which has a diameter
The Aston Martin Virage is a related means of transport to the Aston
The Atlas II, originated from the United States, was launched from Vandenberg Air Force
The Audi A1 has a 1.2 litre engine and is assembled in Brussels,
Douglas R Oberhelman is a key person at Caterpillar Inc. which was found
The AIDAstella, built by Meyer Werft, is operated by AIDA Cruise
The Delta II was launched from Cape Canaveral Air Force Station at the Cape Canaveral Air
The Delta II was launched from Vandenberg Air Force Base at the Vandenberg Air Force Base
The A Rosa Luna was built by Neptun Werft which is located in Rostock
The A-Rosa Luna was built by Neptun Werft in Rostock, Germany, 
The Minotaur V rocket was launched at the Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport Launch Pad
The ALV X-1 originated from the United States where White Americans are an 
The 11th Mississippi Infantry Monument is located in Gettysburg, Adams County,
The National Assembly is the legislature of Azerbaijan which is led by Prime Minister Artur
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army
The Prime Minister of Azerbaijan is the leader of Azerbaijan where the Baku Turkish Marty
Abdul Taib Mahmud was born in the Kingdom of Sarawak and his alma mater is
Abdulsalami Abubakar, who was succeeded by Oladipo Diya, was in office 
American Abraham A. Ribicoff was born in Connecticut and worked as the United States
American Abraham A Ribicoff was married to Casey Ribicoff which was born
Adam Holloway was born in Kent and worked as Member of Parliament for Grave
Agnes Kant is a national of the Netherlands which is led by Emile Roem
Agnes Kant is a national of the Netherlands which is led by Mark Rutte and
Agnes Kant is a national of the Netherlands which is led by Mark Rutte and
Albert B. White, who was born in Marietta, Ohio, was succeeded by
Alberto Teisaire is a national of Argentina which is led by Gabriela Michetti
Alberto Teisaire is a national of Argentina which is led by Horacio Rodríguez L
Alberto Teisaire, who was born in Mendoza, Argentina, was a Rear
Alvah Sabin was a member of Vermont's 3rd Congressional District which
Alvah Sabin was born in Georgia, Vermont which is the largest city in Ver
Alvah Sabin was a member of the Whig Party in the United States which is
Alvah Sabin is a member of the Whig Party in the United States which is
Makis Voridis was the successor of Antonis Samaras, who was born in Athens
Alfons Gorbach was born in Imst, Austria, where Doris Bures is
Mark Rutte is the leader of the Netherlands where the euro is the currency. Ab
The manager of A.F.C. Blackpool is Stuart Parker (footballer)
AEK Athens F.C. play in the Superleague Greece, where Olympiacos
Vila Nova Futebol Clube are the champions of Campeonato Brasileiro Série C
Vila Nova Futebol Clube are the champions of Campeonato Brasileiro Série C
Vila Nova Futebol Clube are the champions of Campeonato Brasileiro Série C
The Accademia di Architettura di Mendrisio is located in Mendrisio,
The Accademia di Architettura di Mendrisio is located in Ticino, Switzerland
The Acharya Institute of Technology is affiliated with the Visvesvaraya Technological University
The Acharya Institute of Technology is located in Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sar
The Acharya Institute of Technology is affiliated with Visvesvaraya Technological University in
1 Decembrie 1918 University is located in Alba Iulia, Romania. The leader of Romania
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University in Denmark is affiliated
A Long Long Way was followed by The Secret Scripture published by Faber and Fab
The book A Long Long Way was followed by Annie Dunne, Annie Dunne
Above the Veil is written in Australians and followed by The Violet Keystone
Cornell University is affiliated with the Association of American Universities which is affiliate
Cornell University is affiliated with the Association of Public and Land grant Universities which
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians is from the United States where Barack Obama
A Severed Wasp is from the United States where English is spoken. The capital
The book Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians comes from the United States where
The AIDS journal is published in the United Kingdom which has the capital city of London
The AIDS journal is published by Lippincott Williams & Wilkins (parent company Wol
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States where Barack Obama is
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States where Barack Obama is
Alan Bean, who was born in Wheeler, Texas, was a crew member of
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire on Nov 18, 1923. He graduated from
Alan Shepard was born on Nov 18, 1923 in New Hampshire. He graduated from
Alan Shepard was a crew member of Apollo 14 which was operated by NASA
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire and was awarded the American Defense Service 
Buzz Aldrin, a fighter pilot, was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey on
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey on 20 January 1930. He was
Buzz Aldrin was a fighter pilot and graduated from MIT with a Sc
Elliot See was a US national and attended the University of Texas at Austin. He
Elliot See was born in Dallas on 23rd July 1927. He attended the University
William Anders was born in British Hong Kong on 17 October 1933. He graduated
Ahmet Davutoglu is the leader of Turkey which is the location of the bronze
The Prime Minister of Azerbaijan is Artur Rasizade. The leader of Azerbaijan is Prime
The Monocacy National Battlefield is the location of the Monocacy National Battlefield,
The Monocacy National Battlefield, Frederick County, Maryland is the location of the
The Accademia di Architettura di Mendrisio is located in Ticino, T
The Acharya Institute of Technology is located in Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sar
The Acharya Institute of Technology in Bangalore, India is affiliated with Visvesvaraya
The Acharya Institute of Technology was given the 'Technical Campus' status by the All
The Acharya Institute of Technology was given the 'Technical Campus' status by the All
The 1 Decembrie 1918 University is located in Romania. The capital of Romania is Bucharest
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University is affiliated with the European
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University in Denmark is affiliated
Alan Bean, a US national, was born on March 15, 1932 in Wheeler, Texas
Alan Bean, who was born in Wheeler, Texas, graduated from UT Austin with
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire on November 18, 1923. He graduated from
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire on Nov 18, 1923. He graduated from
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire on Nov 18, 1923. He was a test
Buzz Aldrin is a US national who was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey. He
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, Essex County, New Jersey. He was 
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey on 20 January 1930. He was
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey. He graduated from MIT with
Elliot See was born on 23rd July 1927 in Dallas. He attended the University
Elliot See was born in Dallas on 23rd July 1927. He attended the University
William Anders was born in British Hong Kong on 17 October 1933. He graduated
The 11th Mississippi Infantry Monument is located in Gettysburg, Adams County,
Pietro Canonica is the designer of the bronze Ataturk monument in Izmir, Turkey
The Prime Minister of Azerbaijan is the leader of Azerbaijan. The capital of Azerbaijan is
The Acharya Institute of Technology is affiliated with the Visvesvaraya Technological University
The Acharya Institute of Technology is affiliated with the Visvesvaraya Technological University
The Acharya Institute of Technology is affiliated with the Visvesvaraya Technological University
The Acharya Institute of Technology is affiliated with the Visvesvaraya Technological University
The Ganges is a river in India which has Mahe to its northwest
The leader of Romania is Prime Minister Klaus Iohannis. The capital of Romania is Bucharest and
The Acharya Institute of Technology is affiliated with the Visvesvaraya Technological University